Utah statutes.
48-2c-1201.   Events of dissolution.

A company organized under this chapter shall be dissolved upon the occurrence of any of the following events:

(1)  when the period fixed for the duration of the company, pursuant to Subsection 48-2c-403(4)(c) or (5), expires;

(2)  at such times as the company fails to have at least one member;

(3)  by written agreement signed by all members;

(4)  upon the occurrence of a dissolution event specified in the articles of organization or operating agreement;

(5)  upon administrative dissolution under Section 48-2c-1207, subject to right of reinstatement under Section 48-2c-1208; or

(6)  upon entry of a decree of judicial dissolution under Section 48-2c-1213.



Amended by Chapter 141, 2005 General Session 

Repealed by Chapter 353, 2011 General Session

